Missouri, session 2026, HB2794.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 9, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 9.406, to read as follows:
9.406. December sixth each year is hereby designated as "Reuben Shelton Day"
2 in Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in appropriate
3 events and activities to celebrate the life and achievements of the president and chief
4 executive officer of the Kappa Alpha Psi fraternity, former president of the Missouri
5 Bar Association, and the first African American elected to serve as the president of the
6 Bar Association of Metropolitan St. Louis and the St. Louis Bar Foundation.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.